Utah statutes.
63G-9-201.   Members -- Functions.

(1)  As used in this chapter:

(a)  "Political subdivision" means any county, city, town, school district, community development and renewal agency, special improvement or taxing district, local district, special service district, an entity created by an interlocal agreement adopted under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, or other governmental subdivision or public corporation.

(b)  "State" means the state of Utah, and includes each office, department, division, agency, authority, commission, board, institution, college, university, Children's Justice Center, or other instrumentality of the state.

(2)  The governor, the state auditor, and the attorney general shall constitute a Board of Examiners, with power to examine all claims against the state or a political subdivision, for the payment of which funds appropriated by the Legislature or derived from any other source are not available.

(3)  No claim against the state or a political subdivision, for the payment of which specifically designated funds are required to be appropriated by the Legislature shall be passed upon by the Legislature without having been considered and acted upon by the Board of Examiners.

(4)  The governor shall be the president, and the state auditor shall be the secretary of the board, and in the absence of either an officer pro tempore may be elected from among the members of the board.

